src/fst/morphology/stems/vocative_nouns.lexc
LEXICON Vocative_Nouns
! Vocative singular
nimosôm+N+A+D+Px1Sg+Voc+Sg: nimosô #;
nôhkom+N+A+D+Px1Sg+Voc+Sg: nôhkô #;
kisîmanitow+N+A+Voc+Sg: kisîmanitô #;
nikosis+N+A+D+Px1Sg+Voc+Sg: nikosî #;
nôhtâwiy+N+A+D+Px1Sg+Voc+Sg: nôhtâ #;
nikâwiy+N+A+D+Px1Sg+Voc+Sg: nikâ #;
niciwâm+N+A+D+Px1Sg+Voc+Sg: niciwâ #;
nimis+N+A+D+Px1Sg+Voc+Sg: nimisî #;
nisis+N+A+D+Px1Sg+Voc+Sg: nisisî #;
nisikos+N+A+D+Px1Sg+Voc+Sg: nisikosî #;
nistîs+N+A+D+Px1Sg+Voc+Sg: nistîsî #;
nisîmis+N+A+D+Px1Sg+Voc+Sg: nisîmisî #;
nîstâw+N+A+D+Px1Sg+Voc+Sg: nîstâ #;
nicahkos+N+A+D+Px1Sg+Voc+Sg: nicahkosî #;
nitânis+N+A+D+Px1Sg+Voc+Sg: nitân #;
nôsisim+N+A+D+Px1Sg+Voc+Sg: nôsisî #;
nitôsim+N+A+D+Px1Sg+Voc+Sg: nikosim #;
nitôsimiskwîm+N+A+D+Px1Sg+Voc+Sg: nitân #;
nitihkwatim+N+A+D+Px1Sg+Voc+Sg: nitihkwâ #;


!Vocative plural
wâhkômâkan+N+A+Px1Sg+Voc+Pl: niwâhkômâkanitik #;
nîcawâsim+N+A+D+Px1Sg+Voc+Pl: nîcawâsimitik #;
nisîm+N+A+D+Px1Sg+Voc+Pl: nisîmitik #;
nicânis+N+A+D+Px1Sg+Voc+Pl: nicânisitik #;
